Utah statutes.
36-16a-102.   Submission of opinion questions to Utah voters.

(1)  The Legislature may submit an opinion question to the legal voters of the state by passing a joint resolution meeting the requirements of this section.

(2)  The joint resolution required under Subsection (1) shall include:

(a)  the language of the opinion question as it will appear on the ballot;

(b)  a statement directing that the lieutenant governor submit the language of the opinion question to the legal voters of the state for their approval or rejection; and

(c)  language designating the regular general election date as the date the election in which the opinion question shall be submitted to the voters.

(3)  After passage by both houses of the Legislature, the originating house shall submit the joint resolution to the lieutenant governor with instructions that the opinion question specified in the joint resolution be submitted to the legal voters on the election date specified in the resolution.

